Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,107
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Title Insurance Agent Act is to provide the State of Nebraska with a comprehensive body of law for the effective regulation and supervision of title insurance agents.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 30.